District of Columbia statutes.
4-208.05

Repayment by GPA recipient.

(a)

For any month in which a person who received benefits under the former General Public Assistance (“GPA”) program received both GPA and Supplemental Security Income (“SSI”), the former GPA recipient shall repay to the District of Columbia:

(1)

The entire GPA monthly assistance payment if the SSI benefits received equaled or exceeded the GPA payment; or

(2)

That portion of the GPA monthly assistance payment equal in amount to the SSI benefits received if the SSI benefits received were less than the GPA payment.

(b)

In order to make repayment in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, a former GPA recipient who applied for SSI must have agreed to have the initial SSI benefit forwarded directly to the Department of Human Services.

(c)

Upon receipt of a former GPA recipient’s initial SSI benefit, the Department shall calculate, in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the amount of the benefit due to the Department as repayment and the amount, if any, due the former GPA recipient. The Department shall provide the former GPA recipient with a written explanation of this calculation and shall pay any amount due the former GPA recipient, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1383 (g) and SSA Interim Assistance Provisions, 20 C.F.R. § 416.1901 to 416.1922 (1983).

(d)

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 805
as added Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-53, § 2(d), 30 DCR 6278
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(s), 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(ccc), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-208.5.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(s) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2760).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701(s) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ccc) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(s) of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 701(s) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 701(s) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(ccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(ccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(ccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(ccc) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.